Virginia statutes. Title 3.2. Agriculture, Animal Care, and Food.
Article 6. Authority of Local Governing Bodies.

§ 3.2-6537.
Ordinances; penalties.

The governing body of any locality may, by ordinance, require a person operating a pet shop or operating as a dealer in companion animals to obtain a permit. Such local governing body may charge no more than $50 per year for such permit. The revenues derived therefrom shall be used for the administration and enforcement of such ordinance.

The aforementioned ordinance may provide: (i) that records be kept by the permittees as are deemed necessary; (ii) for public hearing prior to issuance, renewal or revocation of any such permit; or (iii) for the denial of issuance, denial of renewal or for the revocation of such permit for fraudulent practices or inhumane treatment of the animals dealt with by the permittee.

The ordinance may provide for either a criminal penalty not to exceed a Class 3 misdemeanor or a civil penalty not to exceed $500 for any violation of the ordinance. Any civil penalties collected shall be deposited by the local treasurer pursuant to §

3.2-6534

.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.54; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.84; 2005, c. 307; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for Class 3 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Local ordinances found constitutional. —

A local ordinance that prohibits the owner of agricultural animals from allowing such animals to run at large in the locality is constitutional under the constitutions of Virginia and of the United States. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Christopher K. Peace, Member, House of Delegates, 11-065, 2011 Va. AG LEXIS 35 (6/22/11).

Local restrictions on adoption of animals. —

A locality may adopt an ordinance that authorizes a pound to initiate and enforce policies that place restrictions or requirements upon the adoption of animals beyond those required by §

3.2-6546

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 09-100, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 3 (1/13/10).

§ 3.2-6537.1.
Cash bond for a pet shop obtaining certain dogs.

The governing body of any locality may, by ordinance, require any pet shop offering for sale dogs procured from outside of the Commonwealth to furnish a cash bond, cash equivalent bond, or acceptable letter of credit of not less than $5,000 for a pet shop maintaining for sale an average of 50 or fewer dogs per year and not more than $30,000 for a pet shop maintaining for sale an average of 51 or more dogs per year. A locality may reduce or waive such bond requirement at its discretion.

A locality may terminate the bond requirement for a pet shop if such pet shop has operated without interruption for 10 years and the locality has not, during that period, called in whole or in part the cash bond, cash equivalent bond, or acceptable letter of credit.

If a pet shop ceases business operations, the locality shall have the right to call any bond provided by the pet shop and utilize the resulting funds as reasonably necessary to protect the welfare of the animals or fish from the bonding pet shop.

History.

2018, c. 272.

§ 3.2-6538.
Governing body of any locality may prohibit dogs from running at large; civil penalty.

Any locality may by ordinance prohibit the running at large of all or any category of dogs, except dogs used for hunting, in all or any designated portion of such locality during such months as it may designate. Any such locality may also require that dogs be confined, restricted, or penned up during such periods. For the purpose of this section, a dog shall be deemed to run at large while roaming or running off the property of its owner or custodian and not under its owner’s or custodian’s immediate control. Any person who permits his dog to run at large or remain unconfined, unrestricted, or not penned up shall be deemed to have violated an ordinance adopted pursuant to the provisions of this section. Such ordinance shall provide that the owner or custodian of any dog found running at large in a pack shall be subject to a civil penalty in an amount established by the locality not to exceed $100 per dog so found. For the purpose of such ordinance, a dog shall be deemed to be running at large in a pack if it is running at large in the company of one or more other dogs that are also running at large. Any civil penalty collected pursuant to such ordinance shall be deposited by the treasurer of the locality pursuant to the provisions of §

3.2-6534

.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.63; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.93; 2008, c. 860; 2019, c. 562.

Cross references.

As to regulations of State Health Commissioner of covering local ordinances and requirements, see §

32.1-48.3

.

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 562 rewrote the section, which read: “The governing body of any locality may prohibit the running at large of all or any category of dogs in all or any designated portion of such locality during such months as they may designate. Governing bodies may also require that dogs be confined, restricted, or penned up during such periods. For the purpose of this section, a dog shall be deemed to run at large while roaming, running or self-hunting off the property of its owner or custodian and not under its owner’s or custodian’s immediate control. Any person who permits his dog to run at large, or remain unconfined, unrestricted or not penned up shall be deemed to have violated the provisions of this section.”

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Local restrictions on adoption of animals. —

A locality may adopt an ordinance that authorizes a pound to initiate and enforce policies that place restrictions or requirements upon the adoption of animals beyond those required by §

3.2-6546

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 09-100, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 3 (1/13/10).

Authority of animal control officer. —

An animal control officer is under a duty to remove an unlicensed companion animal from a property owner’s property upon complaint from the property owner, where the animal is not owned by the property owner. If the companion animal is licensed, the officer has the discretion, but not the duty, to capture and confine it. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable Robert D. Orrock, Sr., Member, Virginia House of Delegates, The Honorable Adam P. Ebbin, Member, Senate of Virginia, No. 15-016, 2015 Va. AG LEXIS 30 (10/2/15).

§ 3.2-6539.
Ordinance requiring dogs to be kept on leash.

The governing body of any locality may adopt ordinances requiring that dogs within any such locality be kept on a leash or otherwise restrained and may, by resolution directed to the circuit court, request the court to order a referendum as to whether any such ordinance so adopted shall become effective. Such referendum shall be held and conducted, and the results thereof ascertained and certified in accordance with §

24.2-684

. The court shall require the governing body to give appropriate notice of the time, place and subject matter of such referendum.

The results of the referendum shall not be binding upon the governing body of the locality but may be used in ascertaining the sense of the voters.

History.

1984, c. 492, § 29-213.65; 1987, c. 488, § 3.1-796.95; 2008, c. 860.

Cross references.

As to punishment for violations of local leash laws, see §

18.2-403.3

. As to regulations of State Health Commissioner of covering local ordinances and requirements, see §

32.1-48.3

.

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Local restrictions on adoption of animals. —

A locality may adopt an ordinance that authorizes a pound to initiate and enforce policies that place restrictions or requirements upon the adoption of animals beyond those required by §

3.2-6546

. See opinion of Attorney General to The Honorable H. Morgan Griffith, Member, House of Delegates, 09-100, 2010 Va. AG LEXIS 3 (1/13/10).

§ 3.2-6540.
Dangerous dogs; investigation, summons, and hearing.

As used in this section, “dog” includes a hybrid canine as defined in §

3.2-6581

.

Any law-enforcement officer or animal control officer who (i) has reason to believe that an animal is a dangerous dog and (ii) is located in the jurisdiction where the animal resides or in the jurisdiction where the act was committed may apply to a magistrate for the issuance of a summons requiring the owner, if known, to appear before a general district court at a specified time. The summons shall advise the owner of the nature of the proceeding and the matters at issue.

No law-enforcement officer or animal control officer shall apply for a summons pursuant to subsection B if, upon investigation, the officer finds (i) in the case of an injury to a companion animal that is a dog or cat, that no serious injury has occurred as a result of the attack or bite, that both animals are owned by the same person, or that the incident originated on the property of the attacking or biting dog’s owner or (ii) in the case of an injury to a person, that the injury caused by the dog upon the person consists solely of a single nip or bite resulting only in a scratch, abrasion, or other minor injury. In determining whether serious injury to a companion animal that is a dog or cat has occurred, the officer may consult with a licensed veterinarian.

A law-enforcement officer or animal control officer who applies for a summons pursuant to subsection B shall provide the owner with written notice of such application. For 30 days following such provision of written notice, the owner shall not dispose of the animal other than by surrender to the animal control officer or by euthanasia by a licensed veterinarian. Following such provision of written notice, an owner who elects to euthanize a dog that is the subject of a dangerous dog investigation shall provide documentation of such euthanasia to the animal control officer.

If a law-enforcement officer successfully makes an application for the issuance of a summons pursuant to subsection B, he shall contact the local animal control officer and inform him of the location of the dog and the relevant facts pertaining to his belief that the dog is dangerous.

Following the issuance of a summons following an application pursuant to subsection B, an animal control officer may confine the animal until the evidence is heard and a verdict rendered. If the animal control officer determines that the owner can confine the animal in a manner that protects the public safety, he may permit the owner to confine the animal until the evidence is heard and a verdict rendered. Upon being served with a summons for a dangerous dog, the owner shall not dispose of the animal, other than by euthanasia, until the case has been adjudicated. The court, through its contempt powers, may compel the owner of the animal to produce the animal and to provide documentation that it has been, or will be within three business days, implanted with electronic identification registered to the owner. The owner shall provide the registration information to the animal control officer.

Nothing in this section shall prohibit an animal control officer or law-enforcement officer from securing a summons for a hearing to determine whether a dog that is surrendered but not euthanized is a dangerous dog.

Unless good cause is determined by the court, the evidentiary hearing pursuant to the dangerous dog summons shall be held not more than 30 days from the issuance of the summons. The procedure for appeal and trial shall be the same as provided by law for misdemeanors. Trial by jury shall be as provided in Article 4 (§

19.2-260

et seq.) of Chapter 15 of Title 19.2. The Commonwealth shall be required to prove its case beyond a reasonable doubt. The court shall determine that the animal is a dangerous dog if the evidence shows that it (i) killed a companion animal that is a dog or cat or inflicted serious injury on a companion animal that is a dog or cat, including a serious impairment of health or bodily function that requires significant medical attention, a serious disfigurement, any injury that has a reasonable potential to cause death, or any injury other than a sprain or strain or (ii) directly caused serious injury to a person, including laceration, broken bone, or substantial puncture of skin by teeth. Unless good cause is determined by the court, the appeal of a dangerous dog finding shall be heard within 30 days.

If after hearing the evidence the court finds that the animal is a dangerous dog, the court:

Shall order the animal’s owner to comply with the provisions of this section and §§

3.2-6540.01

,

3.2-6542

, and

3.2-6542

.1;

May order the owner of the animal to pay restitution for actual damages to any person injured by the animal or whose companion animal was injured or killed by the animal. Such order shall not preclude the injured person from pursuing civil remedies, including damages that accrue after the original finding that the animal is a dangerous dog; and

May order the owner to pay all reasonable expenses incurred in caring and providing for such dangerous dog from the time the animal is taken into custody until such time as the animal is disposed of or returned to the owner.

If after hearing the evidence the court decides to defer further proceedings without entering an adjudication that the animal is a dangerous dog, it may do so, notwithstanding any other provision of this section. A court that defers further proceedings shall place specific conditions upon the owner of the dog, including the requirement that the owner provide documentation that the dog has been, or will be within three business days, implanted with electronic identification registered to the owner. The registration information shall be provided to the animal control officer. If the owner violates any of the conditions, the court may enter an adjudication that the animal is a dangerous dog and proceed as otherwise provided in this section. Upon fulfillment of the conditions, the court shall dismiss the proceedings against the animal and the owner without an adjudication that the animal is a dangerous dog.

No animal shall be found by the court to be a dangerous dog:

Solely because it is a particular breed;

If the threat, injury, or damage was sustained by a person who was (i) committing at the time a crime upon the premises occupied by the animal’s owner; (ii) committing at the time a willful trespass upon the premises occupied by the animal’s owner; or (iii) provoking, tormenting, or physically abusing the animal or can be shown to have repeatedly provoked, tormented, abused, or assaulted the animal at other times;

If the animal is a police dog that was engaged in the performance of its duties as such at the time of the act complained of;

If at the time of the acts complained of the animal was responding to pain or injury or was protecting itself, its kennel, its offspring, a person, or its owner’s property;

As a result of killing or inflicting serious injury on a dog or cat while engaged with its owner as part of lawful hunting or participating in an organized, lawful dog handling event; or

If the court determines based on the totality of the evidence before it, or for other good cause, that the dog is not dangerous or a threat to the community.

If the owner of an animal found to be a dangerous dog is a minor, the custodial parent or legal guardian shall be responsible for complying with all requirements of this section and §§

3.2-6540.01

,

3.2-6540.02

,

3.2-6540.03

,

3.2-6540.04

,

3.2-6542

, and

3.2-6542

.1.

History.

1993, c. 977, § 3.1-796.93:1; 1994, c. 115; 1997, cc. 582, 892; 1998, c. 817; 2000, cc. 11, 727; 2003, cc. 785, 841; 2006, cc. 837, 864, 898; 2008, cc. 360, 551, 691, 860; 2009, c. 377; 2012, cc. 107, 236; 2013, cc. 58, 732; 2017, c. 396; 2019, c. 190; 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Cross references.

As to recovery of damages when dog injures or kills other companion animals, see §

3.2-6586

. As to punishment for Class 6 felonies, see §

18.2-10

. As to punishment for Class 1 and 2 misdemeanors, see §

18.2-11

.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2008, c. 360 amended former § 3.1-796.93:1, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2008 amendment by c. 360 has been given effect in this section as set out above, by inserting the last sentence in the definition of “Dangerous dog.”

Acts 2008, cc. 551 and 691 amended former § 3.1-796.93:1, from which this section is derived.
Pursuant to § 30-152, the 2008 amendments by cc. 551 and 691 have been given effect in this section as set out above, by substituting “magistrate serving the jurisdiction” for “magistrate of the jurisdiction” in the first sentence in subsection B.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

The 2009 amendments.

The 2009 amendment by c. 377 inserted the ninth sentence in subsection B.

The 2012 amendments.

The 2012 amendments by cc. 107 and 236 are identical, and in subsection E, in the first sentence, substituted “45 days” for “10 days” and “$150” for “$50,” in the next-to-last sentence, substituted “By January 31 of each year, until such time as the dangerous dog is deceased, all” for “All” and “shall be updated and renewed for a fee of $85” for “shall be renewed annually for the same fee” and substituted “post registration information on the Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry” for “provide a copy of the dangerous dog registration certificate and verification of compliance to the State Veterinarian” in the last sentence; deleted the first paragraph of subsection H, which formerly read: “The owner of any dog found to be dangerous shall register the animal with the Commonwealth of Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry, as established under §

3.2-6542

, within 45 days of such a finding by any appropriate court” and deleted “also” following “owner shall” near the beginning of the second paragraph in subsection H; and inserted “and fees due to the State Veterinarian for maintenance of the Virginia Dangerous Dog Registry” in subsection L.

The 2013 amendments.

The 2013 amendments by cc. 58 and 732, in subsection A, deleted the paragraph defining “Vicious dog”; throughout the section, deleted “or vicious dog” following “dangerous dog” and “or vicious” following “dangerous”; deleted the former seventh sentence, which read: “If, after hearing the evidence, the court finds that the animal is a vicious dog, the court shall order the animal euthanized in accordance with the provisions of §

3.2-6562

.”, and inserted the present eighth sentence; in subsection F, deleted “a tattoo on the inside thigh or by” preceding “electronic implantation” near the end of clause (b); in subsection G, deleted the former second sentence, which read: “The structure shall be designed to provide the animal with shelter from the elements of nature.”; in subsection H, deleted “tattoo or” at the beginning, and “or both” at the end, of clause (v); in subsection K, added the last two paragraphs; and made minor stylistic changes throughout. In addition, c. 58, in subsection F, changed the second occurrence of clause (i) and (ii) designators to (a) and (b). Also, c. 732 inserted the second sentence in subsection G.

The 2017 amendments.

The 2017 amendment by c. 396, divided former subsections A and C into two subsections each and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly; rewrote subsection A and added subdivision A 2; in the second sentence of subsection B, deleted “that has bitten, attacked, or inflicted injury on a person” preceding “shall be found” and inserted “or for other good cause”; in subsection C, substituted “may apply to a magistrate” for “shall apply to a magistrate” in the first sentence; in subsection G, substituted “30 days” for “45 days”; and in subsection M, substituted “30 days” for “45 days” in clause (ii).

The 2019 amendments.

The 2019 amendment by c. 190 divided former subsection C into subsections C, D and F, added subsection E and redesignated the remaining subsections accordingly.

The 2021 Sp. Sess. I amendments.

The 2021 amendment by Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, effective July 1, 2021, rewrote the section.

Law Review.

For 2006 survey article, “Criminal Law and Procedure,” see 41 U. Rich. L. Rev. 83 (2006).

For annual survey article, “Animal Law,” see 44 U. Rich. L. Rev. 185 (2009).

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Animals, § 9.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-419 Affidavit for Summons for Dangerous or Vicious Dog, etc.

§ 3.2-6540.01.
Obligations of officer and owner following dangerous dog finding.

After an animal is found to be a dangerous dog pursuant to §

3.2-6540

, the local animal control officer or treasurer shall provide the owner with a uniformly designed tag that identifies the animal as a dangerous dog. The owner shall affix the tag to the animal’s collar and ensure that the animal wears the collar and tag at all times.

Within 30 days of the finding that an animal is a dangerous dog pursuant to §

3.2-6540

, the owner shall:

Provide documentation that the animal has been neutered or spayed;

Provide documentation that the animal has been implanted with electronic identification registered to the owner. The registration information shall be provided to the animal control officer;

Present satisfactory evidence to the animal control officer of liability insurance coverage, to the value of at least $100,000, that covers animal bites. The owner may obtain and maintain a bond in surety to the value of at least $100,000 in lieu of liability insurance;

Pay to the local governing body a fee of $150 and under the direction of the animal control officer complete a dangerous dog registration certificate issued by the Department pursuant to §

3.2-6542

. No dangerous dog registration certificate required to be obtained under this section shall be issued to any person younger than 18 years of age; and

Post the residence where the animal is housed with clearly visible signs warning both minors and adults of the presence of a dangerous dog on the property. Such signs shall remain posted at all points of entry to the home and yard as long as the animal remains on the property.

Any dangerous dog not confined inside a locked enclosure constructed pursuant to subsection D shall be (i) confined inside the owner’s residence or (ii) if outdoors, controlled by a physical leash employed by the responsible adult owner and securely muzzled in a manner that does not cause injury to the animal or interfere with the animal’s vision or respiration but prevents it from biting a person or another animal.

Any owner of a dangerous dog who keeps the dog outdoors and not within the immediate physical presence of its owner shall, within 30 days of the finding that an animal is a dangerous dog, cause to be constructed a secure, locked enclosure of sufficient height and design to prevent escape by the animal or entry by or direct physical contact with any person or other animal. While so confined within the structure, the animal shall be provided for according to §

3.2-6503

.

The owner of a dog found to be dangerous shall cause the local animal control officer to be promptly notified of (i) any change in the manner of locating the owner or the dog at any time; (ii) any transfer of ownership of the dog to a new owner, including the name and address of the new owner; (iii) any instance in which the animal is loose or unconfined; (iv) any complaint or incident of attack or bite by the dog upon any person or cat or dog; (v) any claim made or lawsuit brought as a result of any attack; and (vi) the escape, loss, or death of the dog.

Unless for good cause shown, the owner of a dangerous dog shall notify the animal control officer at least 10 days prior to moving or relocating the animal and the officer shall update the dangerous dog registry accordingly.

Any dangerous dog not reclaimed by the owner from the animal control officer within 10 days of notice to do so by such animal control officer shall be considered abandoned and may be disposed of according to the provisions of §

3.2-6546

.

Any contract or agreement for the use of real property, including a recorded restrictive covenant, condominium instrument of a condominium created pursuant to the Virginia Condominium Act (§

55.1-1900

et seq.), declaration of a common interest community as defined in §

54.1-2345

, or cooperative instrument of a cooperative created pursuant to the Virginia Real Estate Cooperative Act (§

55.1-2100

et seq.), may prohibit the keeping of a dangerous dog or otherwise impose conditions that are more restrictive than those provided in subsection B.

The owner of a dog found to be dangerous shall maintain the liability insurance coverage or bond in surety required by subdivision B 3 as long as he owns the dangerous dog and shall submit a certificate of insurance or evidence of such bond to the animal control officer on an annual basis.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 3.2-6540.02.
Notice of dangerous dog finding; penalty.

Any releasing agency transferring or releasing for adoption within the Commonwealth an animal found to be a dangerous dog pursuant to §

3.2-6540

shall notify in writing the receiving party of the requirements of this section and §§

3.2-6540

,

3.2-6540

.01,

3.2-6540.03

, and

3.2-6540.04

.

Any releasing agency transferring or releasing for adoption outside the Commonwealth an animal found to be a dangerous dog pursuant to §

3.2-6540

shall notify the appropriate animal control officer in the receiving jurisdiction that the animal has been so adjudicated.

Any owner of an animal found to be a dangerous dog in another state shall, upon bringing such animal to reside within the Commonwealth, notify the animal control officer of the jurisdiction in which the owner resides that the animal has been so adjudicated.

Any owner who disposes by surrender to a releasing agency, gift, sale, transfer, or trade of an animal found to be a dangerous dog pursuant to §

3.2-6540

shall notify the receiver in writing that the animal has been so adjudicated. A violation of this subsection is a Class 3 misdemeanor.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 3.2-6540.03.
Violation of law by owner of dangerous dog; penalty.

If an owner of an animal previously found to be a dangerous dog pursuant to §

3.2-6540

is charged with a violation of §

3.2-6540

,

3.2-6540

.01,

3.2-6540.02

, or

3.2-6540.04

, the animal control officer shall confine the dangerous dog until such time as evidence shall be heard and a verdict rendered pursuant to § 3.2-6540. Unless good cause is determined by the court, such evidentiary hearing shall be held within 30 days of the issuance of the summons. The court, through its contempt powers, may compel the owner of the animal to produce the animal.

Upon conviction, the court may (i) order the dangerous dog to be disposed of by a local governing body pursuant to §

3.2-6562

or (ii) grant the owner up to 30 days to comply with the requirements of §

3.2-6540.01

, during which time the dangerous dog shall remain in the custody of the animal control officer until compliance has been verified. If the owner fails to achieve compliance within the time specified by the court, the court shall order the dangerous dog to be disposed of by a local governing body pursuant to §

3.2-6562

. The court may order the owner to pay all reasonable expenses incurred in caring and providing for such dangerous dog from the time the animal is taken into custody until such time that the animal is disposed of or returned to the owner.

Any owner of a dangerous dog who is charged with a violation pursuant to subsection A and is found to have willfully failed to comply with the requirements of §

3.2-6540

,

3.2-6540

.01,

3.2-6540.02

, or

3.2-6540.04

is guilty of a Class 1 misdemeanor. The court may determine that a person convicted under this subsection shall be prohibited from owning, possessing, or residing on the same property with a dog.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 3.2-6540.04.
Subsequent attack or bite by dangerous dog; penalty.

Any owner of an animal found to be a dangerous dog pursuant to §

3.2-6540

, when such finding arose out of a separate and distinct incident, is guilty of a:

Class 2 misdemeanor if such dog attacks and injures or kills a cat or dog that is a companion animal belonging to another person; or

Class 1 misdemeanor if such dog bites a human being or attacks a human being causing bodily injury.

The provisions of subsection A shall not apply to any animal that at the time of the act complained of was responding to pain or injury, was protecting itself, its kennel, its offspring, a person, or its owner’s property, or was a police dog engaged in the performance of its duties at the time of the attack.

The court may determine that a person convicted under this section shall be prohibited from owning, possessing, or residing on the same property with a dog.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.

§ 3.2-6540.1.
Vicious dogs; penalties.

As used in this section:

“Serious injury” means an injury having a reasonable potential to cause death or any injury other than a sprain or strain, including serious disfigurement, serious impairment of health, or serious impairment of bodily function and requiring significant medical attention.

“Vicious dog” means a canine or canine crossbreed that has (i) killed a person, (ii) inflicted serious injury to a person, or (iii) continued to exhibit the behavior that resulted in a previous finding by a court or, on or before July 1, 2006, by an animal control officer as authorized by ordinance that it is a dangerous dog, provided that its owner has been given notice of that finding.

Any law-enforcement officer or animal control officer who (i) has reason to believe that a canine or canine crossbreed is a vicious dog and (ii) is located in the jurisdiction where the vicious dog resides or in the jurisdiction where a vicious dog committed an act set forth in the definition shall apply to a magistrate serving the jurisdiction for the issuance of a summons requiring the owner or custodian, if known, to appear before a general district court at a specified time. The summons shall advise the owner of the nature of the proceeding and the matters at issue. If a law-enforcement officer successfully makes an application for the issuance of a summons, he shall contact the local animal control officer and inform him of the location of the dog and the relevant facts pertaining to his belief that the dog is vicious. The animal control officer shall confine the animal until such time as evidence shall be heard and a verdict rendered. Unless good cause is determined by the court, the evidentiary hearing shall be held not more than 30 days from the issuance of the summons. The court, through its contempt powers, may compel the owner, custodian, or harborer of the animal to produce the animal. If, after hearing the evidence, the court finds that the animal is a vicious dog, the court shall order the animal euthanized in accordance with the provisions of §

3.2-6562

. The court, upon finding the animal to be a vicious dog, may order the owner, custodian, or harborer thereof to pay restitution for actual damages to any person injured by the animal or to the estate of any person killed by the animal. The court, in its discretion, may also order the owner to pay all reasonable expenses incurred in caring and providing for such vicious dog from the time the animal is taken into custody until such time as the animal is disposed of. The procedure for appeal and trial shall be the same as provided by law for misdemeanors, except that unless good cause is determined by the court, an appeal shall be heard within 30 days. Trial by jury shall be as provided in Article 4 (§

19.2-260

et seq.) of Chapter 15 of Title 19.2. The Commonwealth shall be required to prove its case beyond a reasonable doubt.

No canine or canine crossbreed shall be found to be a vicious dog solely because it is a particular breed, nor is the ownership of a particular breed of canine or canine crossbreed prohibited. No animal shall be found to be a vicious dog if the threat, injury, or damage was sustained by a person who was (i) committing, at the time, a crime upon the premises occupied by the animal’s owner or custodian; (ii) committing, at the time, a willful trespass upon the premises occupied by the animal’s owner or custodian; or (iii) provoking, tormenting, or physically abusing the animal, or can be shown to have repeatedly provoked, tormented, abused, or assaulted the animal at other times. No police dog that was engaged in the performance of its duties as such at the time of the acts complained of shall be found to be a vicious dog. No animal that, at the time of the acts complained of, was responding to pain or injury or was protecting itself, its kennel, its offspring, a person, or its owner’s or custodian’s property, shall be found to be a vicious dog.

Any owner or custodian of a canine or canine crossbreed or other animal whose willful act or omission in the care, control, or containment of a canine, canine crossbreed, or other animal is so gross, wanton, and culpable as to show a reckless disregard for human life and is the proximate cause of such dog or other animal attacking and causing serious injury to any person is guilty of a Class 6 felony. The provisions of this subsection shall not apply to any animal that, at the time of the acts complained of, was responding to pain or injury or was protecting itself, its kennel, its offspring, a person, or its owner’s or custodian’s property, or when the animal is a police dog that is engaged in the performance of its duties at the time of the attack.

The governing body of any locality may enact an ordinance parallel to this statute regulating vicious dogs. No locality may impose a felony penalty for violation of such ordinances.

History.

2013, cc. 58, 732; 2022, c. 614.

The 2022 amendments.

The 2022 amendment by c. 614 in subsection B in the first sentence, inserted “(i),” deleted “within his jurisdiction” preceding and “shall” following “is a vicious dog,” and inserted “and (ii) is located in the jurisdiction where the vicious dog resides or in the jurisdiction where a vicious dog committed an act set forth in the definition shall”; added the fifth sentence; and added “except that unless good cause is determined by the court, an appeal shall be heard within 30 days” in the penultimate sentence at the end; and made a stylistic change.

Michie’s Jurisprudence.

For related discussion, see

1B M.J. Animals, § 9.

Research References.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 9-419 Affidavit for Summons for Dangerous or Vicious Dog, etc.

§ 3.2-6541.
Authority to prohibit training of attack dogs.

Fairfax County may enact an ordinance that prohibits persons from training dogs on residential property to attack. As used in this section, “attack” means to attack or respond aggressively, either with or without command. Any such ordinance shall exempt from its provisions the training of dogs owned by any person who resides on the property.

History.

1999, c. 848, § 3.1-796.93:2; 2008, c. 860.

§ 3.2-6541.1.
Authority to prohibit ownership of particular breed.

No locality shall prohibit the ownership of a particular breed of dog.

History.

2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464.

Editor’s note.

Acts 2021, Sp. Sess. I, c. 464, cl. 2 provides: “That the provisions of this act may result in a net increase in periods of imprisonment or commitment. Pursuant to § 30-19.1:4 of the Code of Virginia, the estimated amount of the necessary appropriation is $0 for periods of imprisonment in state adult correctional facilities and cannot be determined for periods of commitment to the custody of the Department of Juvenile Justice.”

Effective date.

This section is effective July 1, 2021, pursuant to Va. Const. Art. IV, § 13.